Illinois, session 104th, SB3954.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1038 and 6z-149 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Illinois Pediatric Cancer Fund. 8    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)9    Sec. 6z-149. Illinois Pediatric Cancer Fund.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 12Services.13    "Fund" means the Illinois Pediatric Cancer Fund.14    "Pediatric cancer research" includes research to develop 15and advance the understanding of pediatric cancer and the 16techniques and modalities effective in the prevention, cure, 17screening, and treatment of pediatric cancer.18    (b) The Illinois Pediatric Cancer Fund is created as a 19special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the fund may be 20used to provide grants to certain eligible people, 21institutions, and organizations for the purposes of conducting 22pediatric cancer research, prevention, and treatment. Moneys   SB3954- 2 -LRB104 18318 HLH 31758 b1in the fund may also be used by the Department for expenses 2associated with the administration of the Fund. The Fund may 3receive revenue from appropriations by the General Assembly 4and any donations or other moneys accepted for the benefit of 5the Fund.6    (c) The Department shall administer the Fund. The Fund 7shall only be used for the purposes set forth in this Section 8and any unspent portions of the Fund shall remain in the Fund 9and may not revert to any other fund of the State. Moneys 10expended from the Fund for pediatric cancer research is 11supplemental and is not intended to take the place of funding 12that would otherwise be appropriated to the Department for 13pediatric cancer research.14    (d) The Department may annually distribute moneys from the 15Fund to a promotional account to be allocated to a State-based 16childhood cancer organization to be used to promote further 17donations to the Fund and to educate the scientific community 18in this State about the opportunities for childhood cancer 19research through the Fund. The amounts distributed and used 20under this subsection may not exceed a total of 5% of moneys in 21the Fund.22    (e) After making the distributions allowed under 23subsection (d) and using moneys in the Fund necessary to 24administer the Fund, the Department shall use the remainder of 25the Fund to provide grants to eligible physicians, hospitals, 26laboratories, educational institutions, and other   SB3954- 3 -LRB104 18318 HLH 31758 b1organizations and persons to conduct pediatric cancer 2research. Moneys received from the grant program under this 3Section may not be used to pay for institutional overhead 4expenses, organizational expenses, charges that are not 5directly related to pediatric cancer research, or expenses 6arising from community-based support services. 7    (f) On or before August 31, 2027, and each year 8thereafter, the Department shall submit a report to the 9General Assembly on the administration of the Fund. The report 10required under this subsection shall include:11        (1) a description of the promotional efforts 12    undertaken with moneys from the Fund; and13        (2) a detailed accounting of the use of the Fund.14    (g) The Department shall adopt rules to implement a 15pediatric cancer grant program under this Section.